hunspell-en-ru/ru_RU.aff
SFX 306 Y 162
SFX 306   чься жешься       чься
SFX 306   чься жется        чься
SFX 306   чься жетесь       чься
SFX 306   чься жемся        чься
SFX 306   чься жёшься       чься
SFX 306   чься жётся        чься
SFX 306   чься жётесь       чься
SFX 306   чься жёмся        чься
SFX 306   чься гутся        чься
SFX 306   чься гусь         чься
SFX 306   чь   жешь         чь
SFX 306   чь   жете         чь
SFX 306   чь   жет          чь
SFX 306   чь   жем          чь
SFX 306   чь   жёшь         чь
SFX 306   чь   жёте         чь
SFX 306   чь   жёт          чь
SFX 306   чь   жём          чь
SFX 306   чь   гут          чь
SFX 306   чь   гу           чь
SFX 306   ься  ся           уться
SFX 306   ься  ся           ояться
SFX 306   ься  ся           [жшщч]аться
SFX 306   ваться ешься        аваться
SFX 306   ваться ется         аваться
SFX 306   ваться етесь        аваться
SFX 306   ваться емся         аваться
SFX 306   ваться ются         аваться
SFX 306   ваться юсь          аваться
SFX 306   ваться ёшься        аваться
SFX 306   ваться ётся         аваться
SFX 306   ваться ётесь        аваться
SFX 306   ваться ёмся         аваться
SFX 306   вать ешь          авать
SFX 306   вать ете          авать
SFX 306   вать ет           авать
SFX 306   вать ем           авать
SFX 306   вать ют           авать
SFX 306   вать ю            авать
SFX 306   вать ёшь          авать
SFX 306   вать ёте          авать
SFX 306   вать ёт           авать
SFX 306   вать ём           авать
SFX 306   уться ешься        уться
SFX 306   уться ется         уться
SFX 306   уться етесь        уться
SFX 306   уться емся         уться
SFX 306   уться ёшься        уться
SFX 306   уться ётся         уться
SFX 306   уться ётесь        уться
SFX 306   уться ёмся         уться
SFX 306   уть  у            уть
SFX 306   уть  ешь          уть
SFX 306   уть  ете          уть
SFX 306   уть  ет           уть
SFX 306   уть  ем           уть
SFX 306   уть  ёшь          уть
SFX 306   уть  ёте          уть
SFX 306   уть  ёт           уть
SFX 306   уть  ём           уть
SFX 306   ться сь           уться
SFX 306   ться ешься        [^аеоу]яться
SFX 306   ться ется         [^аеоу]яться
SFX 306   ться етесь        [^аеоу]яться
SFX 306   ться емся         [^аеоу]яться
SFX 306   ться ются         [^аеоу]яться
SFX 306   ться юсь          [^аеоу]яться
SFX 306   ть   т            уть
SFX 306   ть   т            оять
SFX 306   ть   т            [жшщч]ать
SFX 306   ть   ешь          [^аеоу]ять
SFX 306   ть   ете          [^аеоу]ять
SFX 306   ть   ет           [^аеоу]ять
SFX 306   ть   ем           [^аеоу]ять
SFX 306   ть   ют           [^аеоу]ять
SFX 306   ть   ю            [^аеоу]ять
SFX 306   яться ишься        ояться
SFX 306   яться ится         ояться
SFX 306   яться итесь        ояться
SFX 306   яться имся         ояться
SFX 306   яться ешься        [аеу]яться
SFX 306   яться ется         [аеу]яться
SFX 306   яться етесь        [аеу]яться
SFX 306   яться емся         [аеу]яться
SFX 306   яться ются         [аеу]яться
SFX 306   яться юсь          [аеоу]яться
SFX 306   ять  ишь          оять
SFX 306   ять  ите          оять
SFX 306   ять  ит           оять
SFX 306   ять  им           оять
SFX 306   ять  ешь          [аеу]ять
SFX 306   ять  ете          [аеу]ять
SFX 306   ять  ет           [аеу]ять
SFX 306   ять  ем           [аеу]ять
SFX 306   ять  ют           [аеу]ять
SFX 306   ять  ю            [аеоу]ять
SFX 306   оваться уешься       оваться
SFX 306   оваться уется        оваться
SFX 306   оваться уетесь       оваться
SFX 306   оваться уемся        оваться
SFX 306   оваться уются        оваться
SFX 306   оваться уюсь         оваться
SFX 306   овать уешь         овать
SFX 306   овать уете         овать
SFX 306   овать ует          овать
SFX 306   овать уем          овать
SFX 306   овать уют          овать
SFX 306   овать ую           овать
SFX 306   еваться уешься       [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   еваться уется        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   еваться уетесь       [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   еваться уемся        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   еваться уются        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   еваться уюсь         [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   еваться юешься       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   еваться юется        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   еваться юетесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   еваться юемся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   еваться юются        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   еваться ююсь         [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 306   евать уешь         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   евать уете         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   евать ует          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   евать уем          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   евать уют          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   евать ую           [цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   евать юешь         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   евать юете         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   евать юет          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   евать юем          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   евать юют          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   евать юю           [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 306   аться утся         даться
SFX 306   аться усь          даться
SFX 306   аться усь          [жшщч]аться
SFX 306   аться ишься        [жшщч]аться
SFX 306   аться ится         [жшщч]аться
SFX 306   аться итесь        [жшщч]аться
SFX 306   аться имся         [жшщч]аться
SFX 306   аться ешься        даться
SFX 306   аться ется         даться
SFX 306   аться етесь        даться
SFX 306   аться емся         даться
SFX 306   аться ёшься        даться
SFX 306   аться ётся         даться
SFX 306   аться ётесь        даться
SFX 306   аться ёмся         даться
SFX 306   ать  ут           дать
SFX 306   ать  у            дать
SFX 306   ать  у            [жшщч]ать
SFX 306   ать  ишь          [жшщч]ать
SFX 306   ать  ите          [жшщч]ать
SFX 306   ать  ит           [жшщч]ать
SFX 306   ать  им           [жшщч]ать
SFX 306   ать  ешь          дать
SFX 306   ать  ете          дать
SFX 306   ать  ет           дать
SFX 306   ать  ем           дать
SFX 306   ать  ёшь          дать
SFX 306   ать  ёте          дать
SFX 306   ать  ёт           дать
SFX 306   ать  ём           дать
